Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Cross references. —

As to highways for defense purposes, see §

19-7-204

.

As to motor vehicles, see title 31.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets and Bridges § 1 et seq.

Highway contractor's liability to highway user for highway surface defects, 62 ALR4th 1067.

17A C.J.S Contracts § 223; 39A C.J.S. Highways § 1 et seq.

§ 24-1-101.
Public highways defined and established; creation by adverse possession.

On and after January 1, 1924, all roads within this state shall be highways, which have been or may be declared by law to be state or county highways. It shall be the duty of the several boards of county commissioners, within their respective counties, prior to said date, to determine what, if any, such roads now or heretofore traveled but not heretofore officially established and recorded, are necessary or important for the public use as permanent roads, and to cause such roads to be recorded, or if need be laid out, established and recorded, and all roads recorded as aforesaid, shall be highways. No other roads, except roads located on federal public lands prior to October, 1976 which provide access for a private residence or agricultural operation shall be highways upon acceptance by the board of county commissioners of the county where the road is located, shall be highways unless and until lawfully established as such by official authority. Except, nothing contained herein shall be construed as preventing the creation or establishment of a public highway right-of-way with reference to state and county highways under the common-law doctrines of adverse possession or prescription either prior to or subsequent to the enactment hereof. If any such board shall resolve the creation or establishment of a public highway right-of-way based upon the common-law doctrines of adverse possession or prescription, it shall, following the filing of a plat and accurate survey required in accordance with the terms and provisions of W.S.

24-3-109

, proceed with the publication of the proposed road for three (3) successive weeks in three (3) successive issues of some official newspaper published in the county, if any such there be, and if no newspaper be published therein, such notice shall be posted in at least three (3) public places along the line of the proposed road, which notice shall be exclusive of all other notices and may be in the following form:

To all whom it may concern: The board of county commissioners of county has resolved the creation and establishment of a public highway right-of-way under the common-law doctrine of prescription in that the road was constructed or substantially maintained by the (either the state or county) for general public use for a period of (ten years or longer) said road commencing at in county, Wyoming, running thence (here describe in general terms the points and courses thereof), and terminating at All objections thereto must be filed in writing with the county clerk of said county before noon on the day of A.D., , or such road will be established without reference to such objections. County Clerk Dated A.D.

Click to view

The county commissioners shall cause a copy of the above notice to be mailed by registered or certified mail to all persons owning lands or claiming any interest in any lands over or across which the road is proposed to be created or established. The publication, posting and mailings of such notice shall be a legal and sufficient notice to all persons owning lands or claiming any interest in lands over which the proposed road is to be created or established. No viewers or appraisers shall be appointed, nor shall any damage claims be considered or heard, and the sole objections to be heard by the board shall be directed against the creation or establishment of such right-of-way under the common-law doctrines of adverse possession or prescription. Any objector may appeal from the final decision of the board of the county commissioners to the district court of the county in which the land is situated. Notice of such appeal must be made to the county clerk within thirty (30) days after such decision has been made by the board, or such claim shall be deemed to have been abandoned. Within ten (10) days after the notice of an appeal is filed in his office, the county clerk shall make out and file in the office of the clerk of the district court, in his county, a transcript of the papers on file in his office, and the proceedings of the board in relation to such creation and establishment. The proceedings on appeal shall be governed by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If the appeal is upheld the appellant shall be reimbursed by the county for all reasonable costs of asserting his claim.

Only that portion of the state highways actually used, travelled or fenced, which has been used by the general public for a period of ten (10) years or longer, either prior to or subsequent to the enactment hereof, shall be presumed to be public highways lawfully established as such by official authority and unavailability of records to show such to have been lawfully established shall not rebut this presumption.

Only that portion of county highways, not to exceed sixty-six (66) feet in width, which was actually constructed or substantially maintained by the county and travelled and used by the general public for a period of ten (10) years or longer, either prior to or subsequent to the enactment hereof, shall be presumed to be public highways lawfully established as such by official authority.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1906; C.S. 1910, § 2513; Laws 1919, ch. 112, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 2977; Laws 1921, ch. 100, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 52-201; Laws 1937, ch. 139, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-301; Laws 1955, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-1; Laws 1967, ch. 56, § 1; 1973, ch. 74, § 1; 2010, ch. 89, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of county highways, see chapter 3 of this title.

As to railroad and telegraph lines being declared public highways, see art. 10, § 12, Wyo. Const.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted the exception in the third sentence of (a).

The 2012 amendment,

made stylistic change in the introductory language of (a).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

History of section. —

For discussion of the history of this section, see Nixon v. Edwards, 72 Wyo. 274, 264 P.2d 287,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1953).

For discussion of legislative and judicial history of section.—

See Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Regulation of use of highways. —

State may regulate or prohibit use of highways only for promotion of safety, peace and general welfare. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Control of highways may in certain cases extend to prohibiting their use, and legislature may subject private carrier to appropriate regulations. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Reasonableness of regulations. —

State or municipal highway regulations must be reasonable, must operate with equality and must have some tendency to accomplish object in view. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

What roads constitute public highways. —

The only publicly traveled roads, not officially established, declared to constitute public highways are those designated as highways on government maps or plats on record in any land office of the United States within the state. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Trail never established as public remains private. —

42 U.S.C.S. § 932 (repealed 1976) was merely an offer from the federal government that could be accepted by actions taken locally, and under the Federal Land Policy and Management Act of 1976, 43 U.S.C.S. § 1701 et seq., any rights vested under 43 U.S.C.S. § 932 (repealed 1976) prior to its repeal remained valid, but under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-1-101

, which had remained virtually unchanged since 1919, where the county records showed that a trail over plaintiff ranch owners' land was never recorded or established as a public road, it was not a public road, and the permanent enjoining of defendant hunting guides and two other individuals from using the trail across the owners ranch was affirmed. Yeager v. Forbes, 2003 WY 134, 78 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2003).

The policy of the legislature is that roads should be shown on the records.

Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

A method by which proof could be made that a county road was established

would be to show that a copy of the plat and survey notes had been filed in the office of the county clerk. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

The establishment of a roadway, in the absence of consent, constitutes the taking of property

by the county for which a party may make a claim for compensation according to constitutional requirements. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

Land to be taken must be identified. —

All persons, including parties whose land is to be taken, are entitled to be informed of the land which the road is to occupy, and the description in the plat should be so definite and certain that a competent surveyor could, based upon the description, determine the road's location. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

Before a county can take the necessary land to establish a roadway it must identify it specifically so that the party owning the land may assert his claim for just compensation. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

Necessity for recording plat of survey, etc. —

A county road could not be established without there having been placed of record a plat of the survey of such road together with the proceedings in relation to its location, establishment or alteration. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954) (decided prior to the 1967 amendment, which extended the doctrines of adverse possession and prescription to county roads).

The survey and plat establish for all time where the road is located

and in effect establish ownership in the county. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

Prescriptive use is not sufficient to establish a public or county road.

This must be established by legal authority. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

A public road cannot be established by public user alone, nor by the working of a road by a county. Nixon v. Edwards, 72 Wyo. 274, 264 P.2d 287,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1953) (decided prior to the 1967 amendment, which extended the doctrines of adverse possession and prescription to county roads).

Prescription defined. —

As respects highways, prescription is an adverse holding under color of right. Hatch Bros. Co. v. Black, 25 Wyo. 109, 165 P. 518,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1917), reh'g denied, 25 Wyo. 416, 171 P. 267,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1918).

Requisites of establishment of highway by prescription. —

Public cannot acquire highway by alleged prescriptive use over vacant and unoccupied land as against the mere silence of the owner, unless in addition to use the county commissioners have assumed control and jurisdiction over the road for the statutory period of limitation. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Uninterrupted use by public for 19 years of a road diverted from its original course as originally surveyed over uninclosed land is not of itself sufficient to vest title by prescription, in absence of showing that road as used was the only practical one, for user to ripen into title must be adverse to occupancy or actual as opposed to constructive possession. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

County board's finding that a public road was established under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-1-101

and the common law doctrine of adverse possession or prescription was supported by substantial evidence showing regular public use of the road that was inconsistent with the landowner's rights and the county's maintenance of the road since the 1950s, which effectively rebutted the presumption of permissive use and established sufficient notice to the landowner that an adverse right was being claimed. Also the county's rights to use the road were not limited to the road's historical use because §

24-1-101

(a) creates a “public highway right-of-way.” Boykin v. Carbon County Bd. of Comm'rs, 2005 WY 158, 124 P.3d 677,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 2005).

Requirements of adverse possession. —

The law of adverse possession or prescription does not contemplate a showing of a person's need for the property adversely possessed. An adverse possessor need only prove that his possession is actual, open, notorious, exclusive and continuous for the statutory period, hostile and under color of title or claim of right. Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Permissive use not adverse. —

Permissive use by the public over the land of an individual for a road is not adverse, and will never ripen into title by prescription. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Where land is vacant and unoccupied, and remains free to public use and travel until circumstances induce owners to inclose it, mere travel across it by public, without objection from owner, does not enable public to acquire a public road over it by prescription. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Procedures to establish road by prescription. —

In order to establish a road by prescription the county need only follow the procedures set forth in this chapter. Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Declaratory judgment should not be used to replace specificadministrative relief. —

Declaratory judgment action filed by the County of Washakie was not the appropriate means to establish a prescriptive public easement because, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-1-101

, the legislature established a specific statutory procedure that required such claims to be brought initially before the board of county commissioners. Ten Broek v. County of Washakie, 2003 WY 164, 82 P.3d 269,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2003).

When points-and-courses description not needed. —

Where there is a map of the proposed road on file, the absence of points-and-courses description of the proposed road in the published notice is a mere irregularity, not fatal to the board's jurisdiction. Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Burden of proof is on county seeking to establish highway byprescription. —

County seeking to establish highway by prescription over unimproved and vacant land not expressly or impliedly dedicated to the public by the owner other than by his mere silence, notwithstanding use by the public, has burden of proving assumption of control and jurisdiction over the road. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Admissibility of evidence. —

Where, in suit to restrain county from reopening traveled road over plaintiff
's land, it appeared that such road was near section line, and connected at each end with a road shown by a map and certain field notes, and was part of road as traveled, map and field notes were admissible to show line of the road in question as officially recognized, and tending to explain use of land in question by the public. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Evidence insufficient to establish highway by prescription.—

In suit to restrain county from reopening a way over plaintiff
's land, evidence was insufficient to show any recognition or control of the way by any board of county commissioners, so as to establish a highway by prescription. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Where a county board found that a public road should be established by prescription over private property, the board's finding that the county's maintenance established its assumption of control and jurisdiction over the road was not supported by substantial evidence. Lincoln County Bd. of Comm'rs v. Cook, 2002 WY 23, 39 P.3d 1076,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2002).

When mistaken belief may excuse late appeal. —

Where a landowner justifiably, but wrongly, believed that a challenge to the necessity of a road was a condition precedent to a hearing on the elements of adverse possession, he should not be penalized for a late appeal, and the case should be remanded to the district court for entry of an order directing the county board to provide a hearing in accordance with this section. Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Section does not apply to an action to establish a right-of-way for a private road

over lands of defendants. Such action was governed by the common law under §

8-3-101

(now see §

8-1-104

). Haines v. Galles, 76 Wyo. 411, 303 P.2d 1004,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1956).

Right of public to use highway can only be taken away through official acts

of board of county commissioners, and fact that commissioners individually authorized one to move his fence and thereby obstruct such highway is insufficient. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Recovery for special damages from obstruction of highway. —

Where plaintiff moving sheep over highway established by this chapter, suffered loss of five sheep and loss of weight of remaining sheep on account of exposure to rain, together with loss of time by reason of defendant having erected fences obstructing highway, plaintiff was entitled to recover damages for injury different from that suffered by public in general. Cottman v. Lochner, 40 Wyo. 378, 278 P. 71,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1929).

Effect of section not considered. —

Where defendant did not appeal from judgment for plaintiff in action for obstruction of highway, effect of this section as to determination of road necessary or important for public use by county commissioners, and conclusiveness of finding as to existence of highway, need not be considered on appeal by plaintiff, alleging error in findings as to width of highway. Bishop v. Hawley, 33 Wyo. 271, 238 P. 284,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1925).

Applied

in

Steplock v. Board of County Comm'rs, 894 P.2d 599,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article “Rights of Way to Mining Claims Across Public Lands in Wyoming,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 162 (1958).

For casenote, “REAL PROPERTY — Wyoming's Private Road Statutes: Approaching A Dead End? Lindt v. Murray, 895 P.2d 459,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 443 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attracting people in such numbers as to obstruct access to the neighboring premises, as nuisance, 2 ALR2d 437.

Liability of governmental unit for injury to traveler from collision with pole erected within highway boundary with governmental sanction, 3 ALR2d 6.

Public regulation and prohibition of sound amplifiers or loudspeaker broadcasts in street, 10 ALR2d 627.

Right of municipality or public to use of subsurface of street or highway for purposes other than sewers, pipes, conduits for wires and the like, 11 ALR2d 180.

Liability of owner or occupier of abutting property for damage caused by fall of tree into highway, 11 ALR2d 607.

Liability for injury resulting from swinging door from abutting property, 16 ALR2d 1161.

Liability of municipal corporation for injury or death occurring from defects in, or negligence in construction, operation or maintenance of electric street lighting equipment, apparatus and the like, 19 ALR2d 344.

Liability for injury on park strip between sidewalk and curb, 19 ALR2d 1053.

Applicability of independent contractor rule to injury or death of third person as result of excavation and refill work on street or highway, 33 ALR2d 7.

Liability for damage to personal property by fall of tree, 33 ALR3d 703.

Liability of municipality for injury resulting from slippery condition of walk, concurring with defect therein, 41 ALR2d 739.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to cut weeds, brush or other vegetation obstructing or obscuring view at railroad crossing or street or highway intersection, 42 ALR2d 817.

Liability of municipality for injury to or death of child caused by burning from hot ashes, cinders or other hot waste material in street or highway, 42 ALR2d 930.

Judicial notice of matters relating to public thoroughfares, 48 ALR2d 1102, 86 ALR3d 484.

Description with reference to highway as carrying title to center or side of highway, 49 ALR2d 982.

Construction or maintenance of sewers, water pipes or the like by public authorities in roadway, street or alley as indicating dedication or acceptance thereof, 52 ALR2d 263.

Liability of excavator for injury or damage resulting from explosion or fire caused by his damaging of gas mains and pipes, 53 ALR2d 1083.

Liability for injury or damage by tree or limb overhanging street or highway, 54 ALR2d 1195.

Liability of governmental body for injury or damage from stone or other object on surface of highway thrown by passing vehicle, 56 ALR2d 1392.

Relative rights, as between municipality and abutting landowners, to minerals, oil and gas underlying streets, alleys or parks, 62 ALR2d 1311.

Liability or indemnity insurance carried by governmental unit as affecting immunity from tort liability, 68 ALR2d 1437.

Power to regulate or prohibit driveways across sidewalk, 73 ALR2d 652.

Power to deny abutter access to street or highway, 73 ALR2d 652.

Traffic regulations which interfere with or restrict access to and from abutting property, 73 ALR2d 689.

Width and boundaries of public highway acquired by prescription or adverse user, 76 ALR2d 535.

Liability of municipal corporation to person injured in fall because of slippery substance such as paint or oil deliberately placed upon surface of street, 81 ALR2d 1194.

Relative rights and liabilities of abutting landowners and public authorities in parkways in center of street, 81 ALR2d 1436.

Liability for damages incident to moving of building where permit has been procured, 83 ALR2d 464.

Regulations as to adjustment or removal of wires of public service corporation to permit moving buildings, 83 ALR2d 464.

Liability of occupant of premises for condition of sidewalk, 88 ALR2d 331.

Liability of property owner who, in discharge of a duty and not of a privilege, makes an opening in the sidewalk, 88 ALR2d 331.

Existence of actionable defect in street or highway proper as question for court or jury, 1 ALR3d 496.

Estoppel of municipality as to encroachment upon public streets, 44 ALR3d 257.

Failure to comply with statute regulating travel by pedestrian along highway as affecting right to recovery for injuries or death resulting from collision with automobile, 45 ALR3d 658.

Recovery of value of improvements made with knowledge of impending condemnation, 98 ALR3d 504.

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury, death, or property damage resulting from defect or obstruction in shoulder of street or highway, 19 ALR4th 532.

Governmental liability for failure to reduce vegetation obscuring view at railroad crossing or at street or highway intersection, 22 ALR4th 624.

Highways: Governmental duty to provide curve warnings or markings, 57 ALR4th 342.

Liability of private landowner for vegetation obscuring view at highway or street intersection, 69 ALR4th 1092.

§ 24-1-102.
Location, survey and construction.

Any such highways, and such additional highways in connection therewith as may be provided for, which are designated as state highways, shall be located and surveyed under the direction and supervision of the director of the department of transportation or his authorized representative, who shall cause plans and specifications of the highways to be prepared, and designate the materials to be used in their construction. He shall take into consideration the climate, soil and materials to be had in the vicinity, and the extent and nature of the probable traffic on the highway with a view to the most economical construction consistent with efficiency.

Where any such highways are designated as a county highway the same shall be located and surveyed under the direction of the county surveyor of the county in which such highway is located; said county surveyor shall cause plans and specifications of any such highway to be prepared and the board of county commissioners of such county shall designate the materials to be used in their construction. Said board of county commissioners shall take into consideration the climate, soil, and materials to be had in the vicinity, and the extent and nature of the probable traffic on said highway with a view to the most economical construction thereof consistent with efficiency. The expense of locating, surveying, and constructing such county highways shall be paid by the county in which such highway is constructed.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 44, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 2983; R.S. 1931, § 52-202; Laws 1937, ch. 139, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 48-302; W.S. 1957, § 24-2; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to road construction generally, see §

24-2-108

.

As to designation of state highways, see §

24-2-109

.

As to duty of county surveyor to make survey for new road, see §

24-3-109

.

As to construction and improvement of public roads and highways, see art. 16, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to construction of roads by mining companies, see §

30-1-128

.

Applied

in

Hardendorf v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 1, 267 P.2d 747,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1954).

§ 24-1-103.
State transportation commission of Wyoming to acquire right-of-way; when right-of-way becomes state property.

The transportation commission is hereby authorized, required and may proceed under the provisions of W.S. 24-2-109(a), to secure the right-of-way for all state highways presently designated by the transportation commission as part of the state highway system or in the future to be designated as part of the state highway system. When any state highway designated by the transportation commission shall occupy in whole or in part the right-of-way of a formerly constructed highway, whether a county highway or a state highway, so much of the right-of-way as is occupied in the construction of the new highway or reconstruction of the previously constructed highway shall become the property of the state.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 44, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 2984; R.S. 1931, § 52-203; Laws 1937, ch. 139, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 48-303; Laws 1953, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-3; Laws 1975, ch. 91, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Applied

in

Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(1924); Cottman v. Lochner, 40 Wyo. 378, 278 P. 71,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1929); Hardendorf v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 1, 267 P.2d 747,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1954); Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959).

Cited

in

State ex rel. State Hwy. Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1956).

§ 24-1-104.
Management and control of county roads.

All county roads shall be under the supervision, management and control of the board of the county commissioners of the county wherein such roads are located, and no county road shall hereafter be established, altered or vacated in any county in this state, except by authority of the board of the county commissioners of the county wherein such road is located, except as is otherwise provided by law.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 1907; C.S. 1910, § 2514; C.S. 1920, § 2986; R.S. 1931, § 52-205; C.S. 1945, § 48-305; W.S. 1957, § 24-5.

Cross references. —

As to establishment, vacation or alteration of county highways, see chapter 3 of this title.

As to powers and duties of county commissioners with respect to roads, see §

18-3-504

.

General power to manage and control county roads. —

Although the board is given very general powers to manage and control county roads, these must be exercised in a lawful manner, and the statutes governing the actions of the board with reference thereto must be construed in pari materia. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

County road cannot be established by implication

through construction thereof under invalid agreement with members of board of county commissioners, individually, when road was not of statutory width and on completion was not taken over by commissioners. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Establishment by prescription. —

Neither this section, regulating establishment of highways, nor any other statute in state is effective to ripen mere use of road by the public into a title or right by prescription. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Private roads. —

The board of county commissioners has no authority to take charge and control of a private road on behalf of the county since its powers are limited to duly established county roads. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Theory of implied contract inapplicable. —

County is not liable on theory of implied contract for benefits received, to contractor who constructed road upon oral authorization from individual members of board of county commissioners when the road was not a county road. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

The obligation to work a road depends upon the exercise of sound discretion by the board,

considering the best interest of the county as a whole, taking into consideration the extent of the road's anticipated use, its importance in relation to other roads, the practicability of maintenance and the availability of county finances for that purpose. Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

When mandamus lies to compel repair. —

Mandamus is recognized as a proper remedy to compel public officers to take care of and keep in repair public highways only when the exercise is so apparent and obvious that the refusal to act is the result of a determination not to discharge a plain duty. Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

Vacating road. —

Agreements by board of county commissioners to vacate an established county road by methods other than those by statute provided were null and void. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of private owner or occupant of land abutting highway for injuries or damage resulting from tree falling onto highway, 94 ALR3d 1160.

§ 24-1-105.
Width restrictions.

All county roads established under this chapter shall not be less than sixty (60) nor more than one hundred (100) feet in width, unless the board of county commissioners determines that a county road be established with a less width; provided, that for the purpose of providing driveways for livestock, the board of county commissioners may open a road to a width not exceeding five hundred (500) feet. Provided, however, that state highways may be established not to exceed three hundred (300) feet in width unless a greater width is necessary for parking facilities, maintenance, excavations, embankments, the deposit of waste materials, or driveways for livestock.

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 1908; C.S. 1910, § 2515; C.S. 1920, § 2987; R.S. 1931, § 52-206; C.S. 1945, § 48-306; Laws 1953, ch. 181, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 24-6; Laws 1959, ch. 165, § 1; Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to width of livestock crossings, see §

24-1-125

.

For discussion of legislative and judicial history of section,

see Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Width necessary for most convenient and advantageous trailing of sheep

is not conclusive on issue of width of highway. Bishop v. Hawley, 33 Wyo. 271, 238 P. 284,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1925).

§ 24-1-106.
Closing or restricting use; when necessary.

The department of transportation may restrict the use of, or close, any state highway whenever the department considers the closing or restriction of use necessary:

For the protection of the public;

For the protection of the highway from damage during storms or during construction, improvement or maintenance operations thereon; or

For a special event or athletic event pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

The department of transportation may authorize the complete or partial closure of designated portions of any state highway for the purpose of conducting a special event or athletic event. The director of the department may use equipment and personnel as necessary. The closure may be authorized only if:

A written application for the event is submitted to the department, containing information the department deems necessary and the application is approved by the director;

A county government approves the closure if the closure would restrict the use of any county road in the unincorporated area of the county; and

The closure is implemented in a manner consistent with the rules and regulations of the department and will cause the least inconvenience to the driving public consistent with the requirements of the special event or athletic event.

If an event calls for closure of a state highway within an incorporated city or town, for which there is no readily accessible alternate route, the city or town shall request department approval for the closure.

For purposes of this section:

“Special event” or “athletic event” means any event which is held outside the corporate limits of any city or town on a state highway but cannot comply with all applicable traffic statutes or ordinances. This shall include, but not be limited to, parades, fairs, exhibitions, motion picture filming, bicycle races and foot races. This definition does not include an event taking place away from a highway which, due to the number of persons attending the event, creates traffic congestion on a highway before and after the event; and

“Partial or complete closure of designated portions of any state highway” means the closing to traffic of any roadway, lane or other portion of a state roadway or highway or any other restriction of the normal use of a highway.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-7; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 67, § 1; 1994, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to closing or obstructing of public highways in connection with vacation of plats, see §

34-12-108

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty and liability of municipality as regards barriers for protection of adult pedestrians who may unintentionally deviate from street or highway into marginal or external hazards, 44 ALR2d 633.

Liability of municipality for failure to erect warnings to traffic against entering or using street which is partially barred or obstructed by construction or improvement work, 52 ALR2d 689.

Liability of municipality for injury or death resulting from temporary condition or obstruction in street in connection with holiday, entertainment, parade or other special event, 84 ALR2d 508.

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury or death resulting from ice or snow on surface of highway or street, 97 ALR3d 11.

Governmental liability for failure to reduce vegetation obscuring view at railroad crossing or at street or highway intersection, 22 ALR4th 624.

Validity, construction, and application of state or local enactments regulating parades, 80 ALR5th 255.

§ 24-1-107.
Closing or restricting use; who may close; notice to controlling agency required.

Whenever a dangerous condition is prevailing upon or so near a public highway as to create a menace to public health or safety, members of the Wyoming highway patrol, police departments or sheriff offices may close any highway to traffic when necessary to protect the public from such danger. Whenever such closing of a highway is done the governmental agency having control over said highway shall be immediately notified of the reason of such closing and the location.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 44, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 24-8.

No duty in regard to stray animals. —

There is no common law nor statutory duty which requires an off-duty police officer to corral or warn traffic of stray animals on or near a public roadway; this section, which gives peace officers the authority to close roadways when they become dangerous, is completely discretionary. Hill v. Park County, 856 P.2d 456,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty of highway construction contractor to provide temporary way or detour around obstruction, 29 ALR2d 876.

§ 24-1-108.
Closing or restricting use; public notice.

To notify the public that a state highway is closed or its use restricted pursuant to this act [§§

24-1-106

through

24-1-109

] notification shall be in one (1) or more of the following forms:

Erect suitable barriers or obstructions upon such highway;

Post warnings and notices of the condition of any such highway;

Post signs for the direction of traffic upon it, or to or upon any other highway or detour open to public travel;

Place warning devices on such highway;

Assign a flagman to warn, detour or direct traffic on such highway.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 44, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 24-9.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.